src/fst/morphology/guesser-simplex-nouns.lexc
HAKKA =  [[[LFoot & [Letter* a]] ] & ~[Foot a ]];

HAKKAMA = [HAKKLE | HAKKA] ;

LEPPI = [[[LFoot & [Letter* i]] ] & ~[Foot i ]] | [[Foot & [Letter* Clmnr Ckpt i]] ] ;
LEPPU = [Consonant* Vowel Clmnr Ckpt u ] | 
             [Consonant* LongV Ckpt u ] | 
             [Consonant* Vowel DoubleCkpt u ]; ! alati ka ELAMA; nähtava orto muutuseta on siit väljas...
LEPPIMA = [LEPPI | LEPPU] ;

ELAMA = [Letter* Letter Letter Vowel ] & ~[RABELEMA] & ~[LEPPI] & ~[HAKKLE];
LihtELAMA = [Letter* Letter Letter Vowel ] ;

GL = [Cgbd [Clmnr | j | v]];              ! AGL: vedru, käbla (KAVA, PERE)
xCL = [Letter Consonant [Clmnr | j | v]];             ! A.CL: eidla, ildna, ustna (AASTA)
KL = [Ckpt [Clmnr | j | v]];              ! AKL: makro, kokni; kopra, tšakra (PERE, AASTA)
xCCC = [Letter Consonant^3];            ! A....: oontsa, oostna, orstnu  (AASTA)
sK = [s Ckpt];              ! AsK: piste, vatse (PERE, AASTA)
Ksk = [Ckpt s k];             ! AKsk: plotski, rupski (AASTA)
xsK = [Letter s Ckpt];             ! AxsK: puiste, inste (AASTA)

!----
ProtoKOND = [Letter* Letter Letter k o n ] ; ! d:"D1"  kond-derivation hack
ProtoAPO = [Letter* Letter] ; ! word pronunciation is not deducible from its letters (e.g. Braille is brai)

!Word = [Letter+] ;
!Name = [CapLetter Letter+] ;


! This guesser lexicon turned into a transcuder is later union-ed with the lexicon-based transducer

LEXICON Root !!= * `@CODE@` is the starting point of everything

!!@D.Part@@P.Part.Bad@@P.POS.NProp@@U.Cap.Obl@   GuessName "weight: 50" ;          !!= * {{@CODE@}}
!@D.Part@@P.Part.Bad@@P.POS.NProp@@U.Cap.Opt@   GuessName ;          !!= * {{@CODE@}}
!@D.Part@@P.Part.Bad@   GuessDerivation "weight: 35" ;          !!= * {{@CODE@}}
!@D.Part@@P.Part.Bad@@P.POS.N@   GuessSimplexWord "weight: 70" ;          !!= * {{@CODE@}}

 GuessSimplexWord "weight: 70" ;
! notice @P.Part.One@; this is what finite verb form affixes require
!@D.Part@@P.Part.One@@P.POS.V@   GuessSimplexWord "weight: 70" ;          !!= * {{@CODE@}}


! K=kpt, G=gbd, L=lmnrjv, A=aeiouõäöü, C=consonant
LEXICON GuessSimplexWord

 < [Consonant* ] > ScanWord ;  ! siin saaks paika sättida suurtähelisuse ???

! weights: every letter = +10
LEXICON ScanWord

! "silp-silbi" haaval vaata edasi
! < [Vowel] >            Vowel ; ! polegi võimalik??? 

! Vowel Vowel Vowel+ possible variants :
! < [[[DoubleVow Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow]] Consonant] >        LongVVowelCons "weight: 40" ;   ! (1)
 < [[[Vowel DoubleVow] & ~[DoubleVow Vowel]] Consonant] >        LongVCons "weight: 30" ;
 < [[[Vowel DoubleVow] & ~[DoubleVow Vowel]] Consonant Consonant+] >        LongVConsPlus "weight: 50" ;
! < [[[LongV Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow] & ~[DoubleVow Vowel]] Consonant] >        LongVVowelCons "weight: 40" ; ! (2) võib-olla (1) on mittevajalik?
 < [[[LongV Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow] ] Consonant] >        LongVVowelCons "weight: 40" ; ! (2) 
 < [[[LongV Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow] ] Consonant Consonant+] >        LongVVowelConsPlus "weight: 50" ; ! (2) 
 < [[[Vowel Vowel Vowel+] & ~[LongV Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow]] Consonant+] > LongVConsPlus "weight: 40" ; ! elsewhere condition...

! Vowel Vowel possible variants 
 < [LongV Consonant] >        LongVCons "weight: 30" ;
 < [LongV Consonant Consonant+] >        LongVConsPlus "weight: 40" ;
! pole diftong, s.t. siin on kindlasti 2 silbi vahel piir
 < [[[Vowel Vowel] & ~LongV] Consonant] >     VowelVowelCons "weight: 30" ;
 < [[[Vowel Vowel] & ~LongV] Consonant Consonant+] >     VowelVowelConsPlus "weight: 40" ;

! Vowel possible variants
 < [Vowel Consonant] >  VowelConsonant "weight: 20" ;
 < [Vowel DoubleCons] >  VowelDoubleCons "weight: 30" ;
 < [Vowel TwoCons] >  VowelTwoCons "weight: 30" ;
 < [Vowel ManyCons] >  VowelManyCons "weight: 40" ;

 FinalSyllables ;   ! final 1 or 2 syllables; here the inflectional type gets finally defined

! --- sequences before arriving at the final syllables
LEXICON LongVVowelCons
  @P.Stress.Off@@C.Len@           ScanWord ;      ! lii-<am>-u

LEXICON LongVVowelConsPlus
  @P.Stress.Off@@C.Len@           ScanWord ;      ! lii-<am>-u
  @P.Stress.On@@P.Len.III@          ScanWord ;      ! lii-<amstr>-u

! ei ole aimugi, kus sellises kohas tavaliselt rõhk on
LEXICON VowelVowelCons
  @P.Stress.On@@P.Len.I@       ScanWord ;      ! a-äs

LEXICON VowelVowelConsPlus
  @P.Stress.On@@P.Len.III@       ScanWord ;      ! a-äst

LEXICON LongVCons
  @P.Stress.On@@P.Len.II@      ScanWord ;      ! <aal>-...

LEXICON LongVConsPlus
  @P.Stress.On@@P.Len.III@      ScanWord ;      ! <aakl>-...

LEXICON VowelConsonant
  @D.Stress@@P.Stress.On@@P.Len.I@      ScanWord ;      ! <ag>-...
  @R.Stress.On@@P.Stress.Off@@C.Len@           ScanWord ;      ! ag-<ar>-us
  @R.Stress.Off@@P.Stress.On@@P.Len.I@  ScanWord ;      ! kal-ah-<ar>-i

LEXICON VowelDoubleCons
  @P.Stress.On@@P.Len.II@      ScanWord ;      ! <all>-...

LEXICON VowelTwoCons
  @D.Stress@@P.Stress.On@@P.Len.II@      ScanWord ;      ! <ast>-...
  @R.Stress.On@@P.Stress.Off@@C.Len@             ScanWord ;      ! av-<ast>-us
  @R.Stress.On@@D.Len.III@@P.Stress.On@@P.Len.II@   ScanWord ;      ! ag-<ast>-us
  @R.Stress.Off@@P.Stress.On@@P.Len.II@  ScanWord ;      ! kal-ah-<ast>-i


LEXICON VowelManyCons
  @P.Stress.On@@P.Len.III@      ScanWord ;      ! <all>-...

! --- here the inflectional type gets defined
! -------------------------------------------
LEXICON FinalSyllables

! --- sõna lõpp, s.t. 1 või 2 viimast silpi
! varasem rõhumuster ei loe
 < [[Vowel DoubleVow] & ~[DoubleVow Vowel]] >        GuessARMEE "weight: 30" ;
 < [[LongV Vowel]     & ~[Vowel DoubleVow]] >        GuessPERE "weight: 30" ; ! Luua, Saue
! < [[Vowel Vowel Vowel+] & ~[LongV Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow]] > GuessSound ; ! mingi häälitsus?

!----------
! Vowel Vowel Vowel+ possible variants :
 < [[[Vowel DoubleVow] & ~[DoubleVow Vowel]] Consonant+] & ~$[DoubleCkpt] >        GuessTAUD "weight: 40" ;
 < [[[Vowel DoubleVow] & ~[DoubleVow Vowel]] Consonant+] &  $[DoubleCkpt] >        GuessFIAT "weight: 40" ;    ! elsewhere condition for messed consonants...
 < [[[LongV Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow] ] s] >        GuessSUULINE "weight: 40" ;  
 < [[[LongV Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow] ] [Consonant - s]] >        GuessREDEL "weight: 40" ; ! (?) vaja kontrollida! 
 < [[[LongV Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow] ] DoubleCons] >        GuessTAUD "weight: 50" ;  
 < [[[[LongV Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow] ] TwoCons] &  [?* i n g]] >        GuessVIRSIK "weight: 50" ; !  
 < [[[[LongV Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow] ] TwoCons] & ~[?* i n g]] >        GuessREDEL "weight: 50" ; ! (?) vaja kontrollida! 
 < [[[LongV Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow] ] ManyCons] & ~$[DoubleCkpt] >        GuessTAUD "weight: 60" ;  
 < [[[LongV Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow] ] ManyCons] &  $[DoubleCkpt] >        GuessFIAT "weight: 60" ;    ! elsewhere condition for messed consonants...  
 < [[[Vowel Vowel Vowel+] & ~[?* LongV Vowel] & ~[?* Vowel DoubleVow]] Consonant+] & ~$[DoubleCkpt] > GuessTAUD "weight: 40" ; ! elsewhere condition... (?) vaja kontrollida!
 < [[[Vowel Vowel Vowel+] & ~[?* LongV Vowel] & ~[?* Vowel DoubleVow]] Consonant+] &  $[DoubleCkpt] > GuessFIAT "weight: 40" ; ! elsewhere condition... (?) vaja kontrollida!

! ?? puudu lõpus ak VIRSIK ?

!-------------
! StrictLongV = [LongV - SemiDiphtong]

 < [StrictLongV] >                  GuessARMEE "weight: 20" ;
 < [[StrictLongV Consonant] &  [e u m]] >              EndEUM "weight: 30" ;  ! possibly muuseum ?
 < [[StrictLongV Consonant] &  [Diphtong s]] >         EndEUS "weight: 30" ;  ! possibly odüsseus ?
 < [[StrictLongV Consonant] & ~[Diphtong s] & ~[e u m]] >     GuessTAUD "weight: 30" ;  ! not odüsseus 
 < [StrictLongV Ckpt] >     GuessFIAT "weight: 30" ;         !  TAUD ~ FIAT ~ PIISKOP 
 < [StrictLongV Ckpt] >     GuessPIISKOP "weight: 30" ;         !  TAUD ~ FIAT ~ PIISKOP
 < [LongV Consonant Consonant+] & ~$[DoubleCkpt] >    GuessTAUD "weight: 40" ;    ! aakk is not good
 < [LongV Consonant Consonant+] &  $[DoubleCkpt] >    GuessFIAT "weight: 40" ;    ! elsewhere condition for messed consonants...
 
 < [SemiDiphtong] >   EndIA "weight: 20" ;
 < [SemiDiphtong s] >   EndIAS "weight: 30" ;
 < [SemiDiphtong Clmnr] >   EndIAL "weight: 30" ;  ! = EndEUM...
 < [SemiDiphtong Ckpt] >   EndIAK "weight: 30" ;  ! KABINET? FIAT?
 < [SemiDiphtong [Consonant & ~s & ~Clmnr & ~Ckpt]] >   EndIACons "weight: 30" ;  ! jms
! [SemiDiphtong Consonant Consonant+] are covered by [LongV Consonant Consonant+]


!?? Vowel j a > LOHAKAS
!?? Vowel k a > LOHAKAS
!?? Vowel t u > TUNTUD
!?? v, tav MAGUS
!?? PINGE
!?? ne (mine, line, lane, ...)
!?? us
!?? Vowel ke


!Cplosive = [Ckpt | Cgbd] ;
!Cspirant = [f | h | [h v]];
!Csibilant = [s|š|z|ž];
!Csonor = [ Clmnr | j | v] ;                       ! excluding foreign letters y w


 < [[[Vowel Clmnr] | [LongV]] [d:T2 | g:K2 | b:P2] e] >   IsPINGE "weight: 40" ;
 < [Vowel [[t 0:T1] | [k 0:K1] | [p 0:P1]] e] >          IsPINGE "weight: 30" ;
 < [LongV Csonor e] >                   IsPINGE "weight: 40";
 < [Vowel [TwoCons & ~[Clmnr Cgbd]] e] >              IsPINGE "weight: 40" ;
 < [LongV [[s Ckpt] | [Ckpt s]] e] >                IsPINGE "weight: 50" ; 

 < [Vowel] >                       EndA "weight: 10" ;
 < [Vowel ShortCons [Vowel - e]] > IsKAVA "weight: 20" ;
 < [i k] > Endik "weight: 20" ;                               ! ik iku ikku; ik iku ikut
 < [e l] > Endel  "weight: 20" ;
 < [e r] > Ender  "weight: 20" ;
 < [Vowel DoubleCons] > GuessTAUD  "weight: 30" ;
 < [i n g] > Ending  "weight: 30" ;                              ! ing ingi ingi; ing ingu ingut
 < [[Vowel TwoCons] & ~[i n g]] > EndTwoCons  "weight: 30" ;     
 < [Vowel ManyCons] & ~$[DoubleCkpt] > GuessTAUD  "weight: 40" ;  ! 
 < [Vowel ManyCons] &  $[DoubleCkpt] > GuessFIAT  "weight: 40" ;  ! elsewhere condition for messed consonants...
 

 < [Vowel Ckpt] >                  EndAK  "weight: 20" ;
 < [[Vowel Consonant] & ~[i k] & ~[e l] & ~[e r] & ~[Vowel Ckpt]] >  EndAL  "weight: 20" ; ! Elsewhere


! verbs
! weight = +20 to push them lower
 < [Vowel Consonant+ e l e ] > IsRABELEMA  "weight: 70" ;
 < [[Vowel | LongV] Consonant+ l e] > IsHAKLEMA "weight: 70" ; 
 < [SiseLeppima a] > IsHAKKAMA "weight: 70" ; 
 < [SiseLeppima i] > IsLEPPIMA "weight: 70" ; 
 < [SiseLeppuma u] > IsLEPPUMA "weight: 70" ; 
! need elama sõnad on ilmselt liiga lubavad...
 < [[Vowel+ Consonant+ Vowel] & ~[[Vowel | LongV] Consonant+ l e] & ~[SiseLeppima i]] > IsELAMA "weight: 70" ; ! tal on mitme tüübiga paralleele 
 < [Vowel+ Consonant+ Vowel] > EndELAMA "weight: 70" ; ! follows a stressed syllable; (compare with IsELAMA) 


LEXICON EndEUM
  @D.Stress@                   GuessTAUD ;     ! z<eum>
  @R.Stress.Off@               GuessTAUD ;     ! raad-ik-<eum>
  @R.Stress.On@@R.Len.I@       GuessTAUD ;     !  rad-<eum
  @R.Stress.On@@D.Len.I@       GuessMUUSEUM ;  ! raad-<eum> 

LEXICON EndEUS
  @D.Stress@                   GuessTAUD ;     ! z<eus>
  @R.Stress.Off@               GuessOLULINE ;  ! raad-ik-<eos>
  @R.Stress.Off@               GuessTAUD ;     ! raad-ik-<eos>
  @R.Stress.On@                GuessOLULINE ;  ! rad-<eus>, raad-<eus>

LEXICON EndIA
  @D.Stress@                   GuessARMEE ;  ! M<ia>
  @D.Stress@                   GuessPERE ;   ! M<ia>
  @R.Stress.Off@               GuessAASTA ;  ! raad-ik-<ia>,
  @R.Stress.On@                GuessAASTA ;  ! rad-<ia>, raad-<ia>
  @R.Stress.On@@R.Len.I@       GuessPERE ;  ! ksen-<ia>,

LEXICON EndIAS
  @D.Stress@                   GuessTAUD ;     ! z<ius>
  @R.Stress.Off@               GuessOLULINE ;  ! raad-ik-<ios>
  @R.Stress.Off@               GuessTAUD ;     ! raad-ik-<ios>
  @R.Stress.On@                GuessOLULINE ;  ! rad-<ius>, raad-<ius>

LEXICON EndIAL
  @D.Stress@                   GuessTAUD ;     ! z<iul>
  @R.Stress.Off@               GuessTAUD ;     ! raad-ik-<ion>
  @R.Stress.On@@R.Len.I@       GuessTAUD ;     ! rad-<iun> 
  @R.Stress.On@@D.Len.I@       GuessMUUSEUM ;  ! raad-<iun> 
